District of Columbia statutes.
47-112

Nonliability for overpayments on government bills of lading or transportation requests.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §§ 47-112, 47-120, and 47-121, or any other act to the contrary, neither the Disbursing Officer of the District of Columbia nor the Auditor of the District of Columbia or any employee in his office authorized by him to certify vouchers, pursuant to the provisions of §§ 47-112, 47-120, and 47-121, shall be held liable for overpayments made for transportation furnished on government bills of lading or transportation requests when said overpayments are due to the use of improper transportation rates, classifications, or the failure to deduct the proper amount under land grant laws or equalization and other agreements.

History

July 30, 1951, 65 Stat. 125, ch. 246, § 3
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Section References

This section is referenced in § 47-121.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-112.
1973 Ed., § 47-112b.

Editor's Notes

Disbursing Office abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 47-111.